Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 11. Interstate State Trust Company, Interstate National Trust Company, and International Trust Company Offices.

Sec. 06.26.810.
Fiduciary operations at a branch or trust office.

An interstate state trust company, interstate national trust company, or international trust company may not act as a fiduciary in this state unless the trust company maintains a trust office in this state as permitted under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

.

If an interstate state trust company, interstate national trust company, or international trust company establishes or acquires a trust office in this state under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

, the trust company may conduct at the trust office any activity that a trust company may conduct at a trust office under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.820.
Establishing or acquiring a trust office.

If an interstate state trust company, interstate national trust company, or international trust company that does not operate a trust office in this state meets the requirements of AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

, the trust company may establish a new trust office in this state or acquire a trust office in this state that is in existence at the time of acquisition.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.830.
Requirement of notice.

To establish a new trust office or acquire a trust office that is in existence at the time of acquisition in this state under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

, an interstate state trust company, interstate national trust company, or international trust company shall provide, or cause its home jurisdiction regulator to provide, written notice of the proposed transaction to the department on or after the date on which the trust company applies to its home jurisdiction regulator for approval to establish or acquire the trust office. The trust company shall file with the notice and maintain a copy of a resolution adopted by the board of the trust company authorizing the establishment or acquisition of the office and shall pay the filing fee established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.840.
Conditions for approval.

An interstate state trust company or international trust company may not establish or acquire a trust office in this state under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

unless

the trust company confirms in writing to the department that, while the trust company maintains a trust office in this state, the trust company will comply with all applicable laws of this state, including, except where the context or this section indicates otherwise, the provisions of this chapter applicable to trust companies organized under this chapter;

the trust company provides satisfactory evidence to the department of compliance with the

requirements for foreign corporations under AS 10.06; and

applicable requirements of its home jurisdiction regulator for establishing or acquiring and maintaining the office;

the department, acting within 90 days after receiving notice under AS

06.26.830

, certifies to the home jurisdiction regulator that the requirements of AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

have been met and the notice has been approved or, if applicable, that any conditions imposed by the department under (b) of this section have been satisfied;

the department receives evidence from the trust company that the department determines clearly demonstrates that the establishment or acquisition will serve the public interest and well-being; the evidence must address the factors listed in AS

06.26.090(b)

; and

the department has received all required fees and the affidavit of publication required by AS

06.26.100(b)

.

An interstate state trust company or international trust company may begin acting as a fiduciary at a trust office on the 91st day after the date that the department receives the notice under (a) of this section for the trust office unless the department specifies a different date.

The department may extend the 90-day period of review provided by (a) of this section if the department determines that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis by the department. If the department extends the 90-day period of review, the trust company may establish the trust office only after written approval by the department.

The department may deny an interstate state trust company or international trust company permission to establish or acquire the trust office if the department finds that the trust company lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed trust office would be contrary to the public interest. When acting on the notice provided under (a) of this section, the department shall consider the views of the home jurisdiction regulator.

If an interstate state trust company or international trust company is not required by AS 10.06 or another law of this state to maintain a registered agent in this state, the trust company shall file a written consent with the department permitting the commissioner to act as the agent for the trust company for service of process in a court action arising out of or connected with the proposed trust office.

An interstate national trust company may not establish or acquire a trust office in this state unless the trust company provides satisfactory evidence to the department of compliance with the applicable requirements of its home jurisdiction regulator for establishing or acquiring and maintaining the office.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For interstate state trust company and international trust company offices, see 3 AAC 4, art. 7.

Sec. 06.26.850.
Representative office business; registration.

An interstate state trust company, interstate national trust company, or international trust company may not provide fiduciary services, but may otherwise engage in trust business, at a representative office as permitted by AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

.

Subject to the requirements contained in AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

, an interstate state trust company, interstate national trust company, or international trust company may establish or acquire representative offices in any location in this state.

If an interstate state trust company or international trust company that does not maintain a trust office in this state wants to establish or acquire a representative office in this state, the trust company shall file a notice with the department on a form prescribed by the department. The trust company shall furnish a copy of a resolution adopted by its board authorizing the establishment or acquisition of the representative office and shall pay the filing fee established by the department by regulation. The notice required under this subsection must provide the name of the trust company, the location of the proposed representative office, and satisfactory evidence that the trust company is chartered or otherwise organized in another jurisdiction to act as a fiduciary.

An interstate state trust company or international trust company may commence business at a representative office on the 61st day after the date that the department receives the notice required under (c) of this section unless the department specifies a different date.

The department may extend the 60-day period of review provided by (d) of this section if the department determines that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis by the department. If the 60-day period of review is extended, the trust company may establish the representative office only after written approval by the department.

In addition to the other requirements of this section, in order to receive permission to establish or acquire a representative office in this state, an interstate state trust company or international trust company must have sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness and the proposed representative office may not be contrary to the public interest. When acting on the notice provided under (c) of this section, the department shall consider the views of the home jurisdiction regulator.

The department may determine by order that an interstate state trust company or international trust company does not meet the requirements for establishing or acquiring a representative office in this state under this section. An order issued under this subsection is effective on the date of its issuance or on another date as the department may determine.

An interstate national trust company shall give the department notice of its intent to establish or acquire a representative office in this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.860.
Additional trust offices.

If an interstate state trust company or international trust company maintains a trust office in this state under AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

, the trust company may establish or acquire additional trust offices or representative offices in this state to the same extent and in the same manner that a trust company may establish or acquire branch offices in this state under the procedures for establishing or acquiring branch offices under AS

06.26.160

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.870.
Examinations; periodic reports; cooperative agreements; assessment of fees.

When the department considers it necessary to protect the public interest, the department or a competent person designated by the department may examine an interstate state trust company or international trust company that has a trust office or a representative office in the state. The trust company shall pay a fee established under AS

06.01.010

for the examination.

The department may require periodic reports from an interstate state trust company or international trust company if the trust company maintains a trust office in this state and from a bank holding company that controls the trust company. The reports shall be made under oath and filed as frequently as required by the department. The reports must contain the information and detail that the department determines to be appropriate as required under regulations adopted by the department.

If an interstate state trust company or international trust company maintains a trust office or a representative office in this state, the trust company may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees as required by the laws of this state and regulations of the department. Fees may be shared with other governmental regulators or any organization affiliated with or representing governmental regulators under agreements between the department and the regulators or organization.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For interstate state trust company and international trust company offices, see 3 AAC 4, art. 7.

Sec. 06.26.880.
Enforcement.

Consistent with AS

06.01.030

and regulations adopted by the department under AS

06.01.030

or this chapter, the department may determine that

an office maintained by an interstate state trust company or international trust company is being operated in violation of a provision of the laws of this state or in an unsafe and unsound manner; or

an interstate state trust company or international trust company is engaged in an activity that the trust company may not engage in under this chapter.

If either of the conditions in (a) of this section exists, the department may take the enforcement actions it would be empowered to take if the office or the company were a trust company established under this chapter, including issuing an order temporarily or permanently prohibiting the trust company from acting as a fiduciary in this state.

If a matter involves extraordinary circumstances that require immediate action, the department may take any action permitted by this section without providing notice or an opportunity for a hearing before taking the action. The department shall promptly give notice to the home jurisdiction regulator of each enforcement action taken against an interstate state trust company or international trust company and, to the extent practicable, shall consult and cooperate with the home jurisdiction regulator when pursuing and resolving an enforcement action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.890.
Notice of subsequent merger, consolidation, or closing.

If an interstate state trust company, interstate national trust company, or international trust company maintains a trust office or a representative office in this state under this chapter, the trust company shall give at least 60 days’ prior written notice, or, in the case of an emergency transaction, shorter notice that is consistent with applicable state and federal law, to the department of

a merger, consolidation, or other transaction that would cause a change of control with respect to the trust company or any bank holding company that controls the trust company if an application would be required to be filed under 12 U.S.C. 1817(j) (Change in Bank Control Act of 1978) or 12 U.S.C. 1841 — 1850 (Bank Holding Company Act of 1956);

a transfer of all or substantially all of the trust accounts or trust assets of the trust company to another person;

the closing or other disposition of any trust office of the trust company in this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For interstate state trust company and international trust company offices, see 3 AAC 4, art. 7.

Sec. 06.26.895.
Definitions.

In AS

06.26.810

—

06.26.895

,

“international trust company” means an international trust company whose home office is not located in this state;

“interstate national trust company” means an interstate national trust company whose home office is not located in this state;

“interstate state trust company” means an interstate state trust company whose home office is not located in this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)